Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 3
HISTORIC AREAS

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 563), the General Assembly directed the Department of Natural Resources to place a historical marker at the entrance to Souther Field in Americus, Georgia, to honor Charles A. Lindbergh.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1985, p. 592), the General Assembly directed the Department of Natural Resources to erect a historical marker honoring Robert Toombs at the site of the Toombs Oak on the campus of the University of Georgia.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 335), the General Assembly designated certain public roads and highways as the Chieftains Trail.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 792), the General Assembly designated Georgia Highway 28 through the City of Augusta as the Savannah River Scenic Highway.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Designation of historic buildings and landmark museum buildings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-8.